src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON RONDANE-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:      K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:      RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:      RProp ;
                  +Ess:n     K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:j     K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:      K     ;
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:      RHyph ; ! for placenames
               +Sg+Acc:      K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:s     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n     K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Nom:t     K     ;
               +Pl+Gen:jd9   K     ;
               +Pl+Acc:jd9   K     ;
               +Pl+Ill:jdda  K     ;
               +Pl+Loc:jn    K     ;
               +Pl+Com:jgujn K     ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:   K     ;
             +CmpN/SgN:   RHyph ;
  +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:   RProp ;
                  +Ess:n  K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:j  K     ;
               +Sg+Gen:   K     ;
     +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:   RHyph ; ! for placenames
               +Sg+Acc:   K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:s  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:n  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:jn K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:t K ;
!+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;


LEXICON HAWAII-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRA-DC ;
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom:%>@U.Cap.Obl@     K                 ;
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@     K                 ;
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>@U.Cap.Obl@     K                 ;
             @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpN/SgN:%>@U.Cap.Obl@     RHyph             ;
                  @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess:%>@U.Cap.Obl@jin  K                 ;
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%>@U.Cap.Obl@jii  K                 ;
!                     @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ji   ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
     @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@     RHyph             ; ! for placenames
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@     K                 ;
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@jis  K                 ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@jin  K                 ; !SOUTH
               @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com:%>@U.Cap.Obl@jijn K                 ;
!              @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom:%>@U.Cap.Obl@jit  K                 ;
!                     @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ji   ACCRA-IICASE      ;
            @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A:%>@U.Cap.Opt@lažž ATTR              ;
            @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž   JOHTOLAT0         ;
     @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža  PxV               ; ! tentative.
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan K                 ;
        @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan PxC               ;
            @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža  LASJOBL           ; ! Under ISSORASSA-


LEXICON HAWAII-sur
            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRA-DC     ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL    ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON SKOHTERMADII-plc
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SKOHTERMADIIDECL ;

LEXICON SKOHTERMADIIDECL !This lexicon now fixed according to Pekkas comments, TO
   +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i      K     ; !
           +Sg+Nom:ij     K     ;
    +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:id'ja  K     ;
    +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:ead'ji K     ;
   +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i      K     ; !
    +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ij     K     ;
           +Sg+Gen:ija    K     ;
    +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:eaji   K     ;
           +Sg+Acc:ija    K     ;
    +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:eaji   K     ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:i      RHyph ; !
         +CmpN/SgN:ij     RHyph ;
         +CmpN/SgG:ij     RHyph ;
         +CmpN/SgG:ija    RHyph ;
         +CmpN/SgG:eaji   RHyph ;
!+CmpN/PlG:ijajd9 RHyph ;
!+CmpN/PlG:ejijd9 RHyph ;
           +Sg+Ill:idjij  K     ;
    +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:eadjáj K     ;
           +Sg+Loc:ijas   K     ;
    +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:eajis  K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:ijat K ;
!+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:eajit K ;
           +Sg+Com:ijajn  K     ;
    +Sg+Com+Use/NG:ejijn  K     ;
!+Pl+Gen:ijajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ejijd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ijajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:ejijd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ijajde K ;
!+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:ejijde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ijajn K ;
!+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:ejijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ejijgujn K ;
!+Pl+Com+Use/NG:ijajgujn K ;


LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL ;


LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%> PLACELASH             ;


LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
   ACCRA-DC     ;
   ACCRA-I      ;
   ACCRA-OBL    ;
   ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL_PLC-ORG !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
   ACCRA-DC          ;
   ACCRA-I           ;
   ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;



LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              DAVVISUOLUDECL  ;
                   @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsV3 ;
           @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsV4 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT          ;


LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted 0-Names - from DAVVISUOLU
   DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL
               +Sg+Nom:X4   K     ;
                  +Ess:X4n  K     ;
     +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8   RHyph ; !
             +CmpN/SgN:X4   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Gen:Y5   K     ;
               +Sg+Acc:Y5   K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:Y5s  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:Y5n  K     ; !SOUTH
!+Pl+Nom:Y5 K ;
               +Sg+Ill:Y6j  K     ;
               +Sg+Com:Y6jn K     ;
!+Pl+Gen:Y6jd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:Y6jd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:Y6jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:Y6jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:Y6jgujn K ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-ani
   MARJA-ani ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-fem
   MARJA-fem ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-mal
   MARJA-mal ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-obj
   MARJA-obj ;

LEXICON MARJA-A-org
   MARJA-org ;


LEXICON MARJA-A-plc 
   MARJA-plc ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-A-sur
   MARJA-sur ;


LEXICON MARJA-ani
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%>               MARJADECL     ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-fem
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>               MARJADECL     ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@    #             ; ! Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-mal
                      +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>               MARJADECL     ;
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@    #             ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/Dimin:%>X6ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON MARJA-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-LOAN-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
                           +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              MARJADECL-LOAN ;
                                  +Use/Sub:%>              PLACELASH      ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT         ; !

LEXICON MARJA-plc ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill ^change (place names)
                              +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>              MARJADECL_PLC-ORG ;
                                             :%>              PLACELASH         ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT            ;

LEXICON MARJA-sur
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            MARJADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii



LEXICON MARJA-I-ani
   MARJA-IU-ani ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-I-fem
   MARJA-IU-fem ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-I-mal
   MARJA-IU-mal ;
 
LEXICON MARJA-I-obj
   MARJA-IU-obj ;
 
