src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Prefix-Proper
Boahi MARJA-I-obj ;
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aftonbláđđi:Afton^bláđđi MARJA-I-obj ;
Anárašmáđii:Anáraš^máđ SKOHTERMADII-plc ;
Asteregievra:Asteregiev'ra MARJA-A-mal ;
Ašen-nieida:Ašen-niej'da MARJA-A-fem ;
Ašeneadni:Ašen^eadni MARJA-I-fem ;
Bieržá:Bier'žá MARJA-mal ;
Bihttá MARJA-plc ;
Boahenásti:Boahe^nás'ti MARJA-I-obj ;
Boahjenásti:Boahje^nás'ti MARJA-I-obj ;
Boazodoalloláhka:Boazo#doallo#láh'ka MARJA-A-obj ;
Lávgá:Láv'gá MARJA-A-ani ;
Bánccojohka:Báncco^joh'ka MARJA-A-plc ;
Cirga:Cir'ga MARJA-A-ani ;
Clydekanála:Clyde^kanála MARJA-A-obj ;
D-Norlánda:D-Nor^lán'da MARJA-LOAN-plc ;
Davvioarjeuniversitehta:Davvi^oarje^universitehta MARJA-A-org ;
Davvisuolu:Davvi^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Dorrá:Dor'rá MARJA-plc ; !Tårstad
E-Norlánda:E-Nor^lán'da MARJA-LOAN-plc ;
Eanandoallodepartemeanta+Use/Sub:Eana^doallo^departemean'ta MARJA-A-org ;
Eiderkanála:Eider^kanála MARJA-A-obj ;
Soavveljávregoahti:Soavvel^jávre^goah'ti MARJA-I-obj ;
Finnmárkokommišuvdna+Use/Sub:Finn^márkku^komišuvdna MARJA-A-org ;
Finnmárkoláhka:Finn^márko^láh'ka MARJA-A-obj ; !dasgo láhka ii leat Finnmárkku hálddus muhto dušše guoská dasa; vrd.  giellaláhka, gieldaláhka,  skuvlaláhka
Gappatjohka:Gappat^joh'ka MARJA-A-plc ;
Gearpmašjármáđii:Gearpmaš^jár^máđ SKOHTERMADII-plc ;
NM-scootercrossa+Use/Sub:NM-scooter#cros'sa MARJA-obj ;
NM-skutercrossa:NM-skuter#cros'sa MARJA-obj ;
NM-skuhtercrossa:NM-skuhter#cros'sa MARJA-obj ;
NM-skohtercrossa:NM-skohter#cros'sa MARJA-obj ;
Giebbo MARJA-mal ; !Turi, muitalus...
Goaskinsuolu:Goaskin^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Goavka-Vulle:Goavka-Vul'le MARJA-mal ;
Goavka:Goav'ka MARJA-A-mal ;
Guhkesjárskáidá:Guhkes^jár^skáj'dá MARJA-plc ;
Gurge:Gur'ge MARJA-ani ;
Guvla:Guv'la MARJA-A-plc ;
Rievvárnieida:Rievvár^niej'da MARJA-A-sur ;
Berlinmuvra:Berlin^muv'ra MARJA-A-obj ;
Hearrá:Hear'rá MARJA-mal ;
Heavdne-Mánni:Heavdne-Mán'ni MARJA-I-mal ;
Henddo:Henddo MARJA-mal ;
Huika:Huj'ka MARJA-A-mal ;
Hánassuolu:Hánas^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ; !FIN
Ipmeláhčči+v1:Ipmel^áhčči MARJA-I-mal ;
Ipmeláhčči+v2:Ipmil^áhčči MARJA-I-mal ;
Ipmil% Áhčči MARJA-I-mal ;
Ipmila% Bárdni MARJA-I-mal ;
Iskko:Iskko MARJA-mal ;
Jeagge% Jussá:Jeagge% Jus'sá MARJA-obj ;
Jeagilvármáđii:Jeagil^vár^máđ SKOHTERMADII-plc ;
Jegerkommando:Jeger^komman'do MARJA-obj ;
Juovla-Skálla:Juovla-Skál'la MARJA-A-obj ;
Gártnetluohkká:Gártnet^luohkká MARJA-plc ;
Justiisa-% ja% politiijadepartemeanta+Use/Sub:Justis-% ja% politiija^departemean'ta MARJA-A-org ;
Kulturbryggeriija:Kultur^bryggeriija NIKOSIIJA-obj ;
Korállamearra:Korálla^mearra MARJA-A-plc ;
Káisá:Káj'sá MARJA-fem ;
Láila:Láj'la MARJA-A-fem ;
Láilá:Láj'lá MARJA-fem ;
Lásságámmi:Lássá^gám'mi MARJA-I-obj ;
Meahcce% Vulle:Meahcce% Vul'le MARJA-ani ;
Miellesuolu:Mielle^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Mumiáhčči:Mumi^áhčči MARJA-I-ani ;
Máijá:Máj'já MARJA-fem ;
Naika:Naj'ka MARJA-A-ani ;
Nearvá:Near'vá MARJA-plc ;
Nillásjohka:Nillás^joh'ka MARJA-A-plc ; !FIN
Njoalpá:Njoal'pá MARJA-A-mal ; !Turi, muitalus
Norgesbáhkka:Norges#báhkka MARJA-A-obj ;
Oljo-% ja% energiijadepartemeanta+CmpN/None:Oljo-% ja% energiija^departemean'ta MARJA-A-org ;
Ruovttotjohka:Ruovttot^joh'ka MARJA-A-plc ;
Ránská:Ráns'ká MARJA-plc ;
Scottsuolu:Scott^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Sipirjá-Liisá:Sipirjá-Lij'sá MARJA-fem ;
Snuoggi MARJA-I-ani ;
Sosiálakantuvra:Sosiála^kantuv'ra MARJA-A-org ;
Stuorra-Ánne:Stuorra-Án'ne MARJA-fem ;
Sáivvasuolu:Sáivva^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ; !FIN
Sámeválgastivra:Sáme^válga^stiv'ra MARJA-A-org ;
Sáppatbáddi:Sáppat^báddi MARJA-I-mal ;
Viervuonlássá:Vier^vuon^lás'sá MARJA-plc ;
Áillonieida:Áillo^niej'da MARJA-A-fem ;
Vuođđoláhka:Vuođđo^láh'ka MARJA-A-obj ;
Várjjatvuonbađa-Girkonjárga+Use/LexSub:Várjjat^vuon^bađa-Girkonjár'ga MARJA-A-plc ; !
Väkkäraš-Heaika:Väkkäraš-Heaj'ka MARJA-A-mal ;
Áike:Áj'ke MARJA-mal ;
Ámmongárggu:Ámmon^gár'gu DAVVISUOLU-plc ; !FIN
Čirri-Áne MARJA-fem ;
Čirri-Ánne:Čirri-Án'ne MARJA-fem ;
Šlumpi:Šlum'pi MARJA-I-mal ;
Šlurfi:Šlur'fi MARJA-I-ani ;
Idjajávregáddi:Idja^jávre^gáddi MARJA-I-obj ;
Vildagazza:Vilda^gazza MARJA-A-ani ;
S-gabba:S-gabba MARJA-A-ani ;
